Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 6
WORKPLACE LITERACY PROGRAMS

23-60-601. Certification of programs.

In the interest of promoting adult literacy, the state board for community colleges and occupational education, in consultation with the college advisory councils of the community and local district colleges, shall develop and employ a program of certification for workplace literacy programs.

Certification shall identify those programs, completion of which shall be accepted as satisfaction of basic skill prerequisites and placement testing for occupational training in the state system of community and local district colleges. Exemption from placement testing shall be available to anyone satisfactorily completing a certified workplace literacy program within one year of enrollment in any local district or community college. For purposes of this section, the term "basic skill prerequisites" means instruction in basic literacy and math skills which are necessary for placement in certificate and degree course programs at state community or local district colleges.

The board shall develop and establish criteria, procedures, and accountability standards for the certification of workplace literacy programs. Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the operation of any workplace literacy program which is not certified according to the terms of this section, but no community or local district college shall credit completion in the workplace of basic skill prerequisites which are not completed in a certified program.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 866, § 1, effective July 1.